Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1017.01
Local system
formula resources; amounts included.

For state aid calculated for school fiscal years prior to
school fiscal year 2012-13, local system formula resources includes
retirement aid determined under section 79-1028.03, allocated income tax funds
determined for each such district pursuant to the provisions of section 79-1005.01, and adjustments pursuant to section
79-1008.02.

For state
aid calculated for school fiscal years 2012-13 and 2013-14, local system formula
resources includes retirement aid determined under section 79-1028.03, allocated
income tax funds determined for each district pursuant to section 79-1005.01,
and adjustments pursuant to section 79-1008.02, and is reduced by amounts
paid by the district in the most recently available complete data year as
property tax refunds pursuant to or in the manner prescribed by section 77-1736.06.

For state
aid calculated for school fiscal year 2014-15 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, local system formula resources includes allocated income tax funds
determined for each district pursuant to section 79-1005.01 and adjustments
pursuant to section 79-1008.02 and is reduced by amounts paid by the district
in the most recently available complete data year as property tax refunds
pursuant to or in the manner prescribed by section 77-1736.06.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 48;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 17.